Massachusetts, session 194th, H3599.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
PREAMBLE. By Chapter 463 of the Acts of 1869, the Legislature enfranchised all
Native American Indians and declared that they were citizens of the Commonwealth, entitled to
all the rights, privileges and duties of other citizens. The Act also affirmed that lands previously
set off to any Indian were to become the property of such person and his heirs in fee simple.
Thereafter, various acts were adopted for the disposition of common lands at Chappaquiddick,
Dudley, Gay Head, Herring Pond and Mashpee. The previously set off lands and the lands
divided from the common lands were intended to have the full rights and benefits of property
ownership, including the right to reasonable residential use and access.
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, lots created for
the Native American Indians at Chappaquiddick, Dudley, Gay Head, Herring Pond or Mashpee,
and the lots created from the partition of common lands in those former Indian districts, shall be
deemed to have been granted in fee simple absolute with no restraint on alienation. If express
of 2

easements do not exist for such lots, the superior court shall have jurisdiction to establish forty-
foot wide easements to a public way over public lands, including land held by any land bank, for
vehicular access and underground utilities to such lots. If public lands are not available to
provide an express easement to any such lot, new forty-foot wide easements shall be created to
the nearest public way by the superior court, with the court establishing all the necessary parties
required for an equitable resolution. Such easements shall be considered ways that were in
existence when the subdivision control law became effective in the city or town in which the
land lies, providing sufficient frontage, width, suitable grades and adequate construction to
support the needs of vehicular traffic in relation to the residential use of the land, for adequate
public safety and for the installation of underground utilities to serve such land and the buildings
erected or to be erected thereon. The frontage of the easements shall be of such distance as is
required by zoning or other ordinance or by-law, to allow for residential dwellings on such lots.
of 2